Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2017 Act are added  to and made a part of ORS
chapter 432.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a grant program for the
purpose of allowing an individual who is homeless to obtain a certified copy of the individual’s
record of live birth at a reduced rate or free of charge.
(2) In administering the program, the authority:
(a) Shall  award grants to state, regional and local agencies and organizations listed in
ORS 458.528 for the purpose specified in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) Shall develop criteria for receiving a grant under this section and processes for ap-
plying for a grant under this section;
(c) May require recipients of a grant  to report to the authority on the use of grant funds;
and
(d) Shall adopt by rule a definition for the term “individual who is homeless” that  gives
the term the same meaning as provided  in 42 U.S.C. 11302 for the terms “homeless,”
“homeless individual” and “homeless person.”
SECTION 3.
(1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct  from
the General Fund, the Birth Certificates for Homeless Persons Fund. Interest  earned by the
Birth Certificates for Homeless Persons Fund  shall be credited to the fund. All moneys in
the Birth Certificates for Homeless Persons Fund are  continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Health Authority for purposes of section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The Birth Certificates for Homeless Persons Fund shall consist of all  moneys credited
to the fund, including  moneys appropriated or transferred to the fund by the Legislative
Assembly.
SECTION 4.  ORS 432.435 is amended to read:
432.435. (1) Except as provided in ORS 432.445 and subsection  (2) of this section, [ and subject to
the review of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, ] the  Oregon Health Authority shall
establish [ all] fees for the services provided under this  chapter. [ The fees and charges established
under this section  shall be authorized by the Legislative Assembly for the authority’s budget, as the
budget may be modified by the Emergency Board. ]
Enrolled House Bill 2402 (HB 2402-A) Page 1
(2) The State Registrar of  the Center for Health Statistics shall search the system of vital sta-
tistics and issue certified copies or other documents, as appropriate, without charge if the search
or issuance is:
(a) Requested in connection with a pending application for benefits from  the United States De-
partment of Veterans Affairs, if proof of the application is first submitted; or
(b) In response to an administrative error as determined by the state registrar.
(3) Fees collected under this section [ shall] must be deposited in the Oregon Health Authority
Fund and are continuously appropriated to the Center for Health Statistics for  the purpose of ad-
ministering this chapter.
SECTION 5.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $50,000 for deposit into the Birth
Certificates for Homeless Persons Fund established in section 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 6. The Oregon Health  Authority shall begin issuing grants under section 2 of
this 2017 Act on or before July 1, 2018.
SECTION 7. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House June 14, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2402 (HB 2402-A) Page 2